Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB423.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Area of the racing facility" means within a five (5) mile radius of the
perimeter of a property or contiguous group of properties where a racing
facility is located; and
(b) "Racing facility" means a designated area or facility where competitive
vehicle and motorsport races are conducted, including the track, spectator
areas, garages, and any associated grounds, buildings, or appurtenances
used to conduct the races.
(2) A racing facility shall not be subject to any action brought by a surrounding real
property owner under any nuisance or taking cause of action if the racing facility
was constructed:
(a) In accordance with state and local laws, ordinances, and regulations; and
(b) Before the surrounding real property owner purchased the applicable real
property or constructed any building in the area of the racing facility.
(3) The immunity provided in this section shall apply regardless of any changes to
the size, scope, configuration, technology, or type of racing conducted at the
racing facility, provided the changes are lawful.
Section 2. Whereas racing facilities have invested resources and are currently
operating in local communities of the Commonwealth, bringing amusement, recreation,
and economic development, and should be allowed to continue in operation, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/15/2026 3:52 PM Jacketed